District of Columbia statutes.
10-1905

Transfer of real property pursuant to Memorandum of Agreement.

Notwithstanding Chapter 8 of this title [§ 10-801 et seq.], the Mayor is authorized to transfer the subject real property to the applicable public benefit conveyance applicant in accordance with the terms of the applicable Memorandum of Agreement.

Oct. 16, 2012, D.C. Law 19-175, § 6, 59 DCR 9106
For temporary addition of section, see § 6 of the Walter Reed Army Medical Center Base Realignment and Closure Homeless Assistance Submission Congressional Review Emergency Approval Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-528, November 2, 2012, 59 DCR 13325), applicable as of October 16, 2012.